src/fst/morphology/stems/ojibwe_verbs.lexc
LEXICON VII_Class=VII_d_Flags
@R.Prefix.%<CHCNJ%>@ VII_Class=VII_d_Flags_Prefix=%<CHCNJ%> ;
@R.Prefix.GAA-@ VII_Class=VII_d_Flags_Prefix=GAA- ;
@R.Prefix.NONE@ VII_Class=VII_d_Flags_Prefix=NONE ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: VII, Class: VII_d                                          !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending_Prefix=NONE                                        !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VII_Class=VII_d_Flags_Prefix=NONE
@U.Order.Cnj@ VII_Class=VII_d_Prefix=NONE_Order=Cnj_Endings ;
@U.Order.Ind@ VII_Class=VII_d_Prefix=NONE_Order=Ind_Endings ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: VII, Class: VII_d, Prefix: NONE, Order: Cnj                !
!         Endings                                                              !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VII_Class=VII_d_Prefix=NONE_Order=Cnj_Endings
+VII+Cnj+Neg+Dub+%0PlObvSubj:sininiigwen EncliticRoot ;
+VII+Cnj+Neg+Dub+%0PlSubj:sinoogwen EncliticRoot ;
+VII+Cnj+Neg+Dub+%0SgObvSubj:sininiigwen EncliticRoot ;
+VII+Cnj+Neg+Dub+%0SgSubj:sinoogwen EncliticRoot ;
+VII+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+%0PlObvSubj:sininigobanen EncliticRoot ;
+VII+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+%0PlSubj:sinoogobanen EncliticRoot ;
+VII+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+%0SgObvSubj:sininigobanen EncliticRoot ;
+VII+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+%0SgSubj:sinoogobanen EncliticRoot ;
+VII+Cnj+Neg+Neu+%0PlObvSubj:sininig EncliticRoot ;
+VII+Cnj+Neg+Neu+%0PlSubj:sinog EncliticRoot ;
+VII+Cnj+Neg+Neu+%0PlSubj:sinok EncliticRoot ;
+VII+Cnj+Neg+Neu+%0SgObvSubj:sininig EncliticRoot ;
+VII+Cnj+Neg+Neu+%0SgSubj:sinog EncliticRoot ;
+VII+Cnj+Neg+Neu+%0SgSubj:sinok EncliticRoot ;
+VII+Cnj+Neg+Prt+%0PlObvSubj:sininigiban EncliticRoot ;
+VII+Cnj+Neg+Prt+%0PlSubj:sinoogiban EncliticRoot ;
+VII+Cnj+Neg+Prt+%0SgObvSubj:sininigiban EncliticRoot ;
+VII+Cnj+Neg+Prt+%0SgSubj:sinoogiban EncliticRoot ;
+VII+Cnj+Pos+Dub+%0PlObvSubj:inigwen EncliticRoot ;
+VII+Cnj+Pos+Dub+%0PlSubj:ogwen EncliticRoot ;
+VII+Cnj+Pos+Dub+%0SgObvSubj:inigwen EncliticRoot ;
+VII+Cnj+Pos+Dub+%0SgObvSubj:ininigwen EncliticRoot ;
+VII+Cnj+Pos+Dub+%0SgSubj:ogwen EncliticRoot ;
+VII+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+%0PlObvSubj:inigobanen EncliticRoot ;
+VII+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+%0PlSubj:ogobanen EncliticRoot ;
+VII+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+%0SgObvSubj:inigobanen EncliticRoot ;
+VII+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+%0SgSubj:ogobanen EncliticRoot ;
+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+%0PlObvSubj:inig EncliticRoot ;
+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+%0PlObvSubj:ininig EncliticRoot ;
+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+%0PlSubj:k EncliticRoot ;
+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+%0PlSubj:kin EncliticRoot ;
+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+%0SgObvSubj:inig EncliticRoot ;
+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+%0SgSubj:k EncliticRoot ;
+VII+Cnj+Pos+Prt+%0PlObvSubj:inigiban EncliticRoot ;
+VII+Cnj+Pos+Prt+%0PlObvSubj:ininigiban EncliticRoot ;
+VII+Cnj+Pos+Prt+%0PlSubj:kiban EncliticRoot ;
+VII+Cnj+Pos+Prt+%0SgObvSubj:inigiban EncliticRoot ;
+VII+Cnj+Pos+Prt+%0SgSubj:kiban EncliticRoot ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: VII, Class: VII_n                                          !
!         Morpheme boundary between stem and suffix                            !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary
0:%>%> VII_Class=VII_n_Flags ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: VII, Class: VII_n                                          !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending                                                    !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VII_Class=VII_n_Flags
@R.Prefix.%<CHCNJ%>@ VII_Class=VII_n_Flags_Prefix=%<CHCNJ%> ;
@R.Prefix.GAA-@ VII_Class=VII_n_Flags_Prefix=GAA- ;
@R.Prefix.NONE@ VII_Class=VII_n_Flags_Prefix=NONE ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: VII, Class: VII_n                                          !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending_Prefix=NONE                                        !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VII_Class=VII_n_Flags_Prefix=NONE
@U.Order.Cnj@ VII_Class=VII_n_Prefix=NONE_Order=Cnj_Endings ;
@U.Order.Ind@ VII_Class=VII_n_Prefix=NONE_Order=Ind_Endings ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: VII, Class: VII_n, Prefix: NONE, Order: Cnj                !
!         Endings                                                              !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VII_Stems
aabita-niibin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
aadadin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
aanikoogin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
aasamisin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
aayaanikoosinoon:aayaanikoosin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
aazhidemon VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
aazhooyaasin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
agawaatebiigisin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
agozigwadin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
agwaasin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
agwaseyaabowesin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
akoodamon VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
akwaasin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
anibeyaakwadin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
animibiisaan VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
anisaagamin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
apagajibiiwadaasin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
apiita'an VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
apiitakamigadin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
ashawesin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
ashkanjiiwan VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
asiniiwan VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
ayaanigokosinoon:ayaanigokosin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
azhiwaasin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
baabiiwisin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
baakawan VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
baakiwebaasin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
baasadin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
baashkisin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
baawanadin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
babaamezhisin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
babiikwadaagonagaasin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
badakaagonesin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
bagamaasin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
bagida'an VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
bagwaasin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
bakidaakosin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
bakobiiyaasin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
bakwakiiyaasin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
banaadaagamisin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
bangisin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
bapangisin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
bazagosin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
bengwan VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
bezhigwadamon VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
biboon VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
biichi-niibin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
biidaakwamon VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
biigijiisagowan VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
biijinaa'an VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
biimiskojiwan VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
biindigejiwan VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
biisibiisaan VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
biitookwadin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
biiwan VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
bimaa'an VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
bimaasin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
bimidaasin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
bimijiwebaasin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
binaasin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
biskaabiigisin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
bizhishigwaakosin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
bookwaasin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
daangisin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
dabasaakwaasin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
dakaagamisin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
dakigamisin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
dakwaakojii-manoomin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
dasinoon:dasin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
dazhwegaasin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
desaakosin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
dimiiyaakwajin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
ditibakamigisin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
ezhisin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
gadiskaa'an VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
gagwaanisagi-onizhishin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
gakisin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
gashkiiwadin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
geshawaabiisin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
gibaakwaasin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
gibogin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
gichiwaasin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
gidaasin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
giganwiisin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
giishkaamikijiwan VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
giiwe-ziigwan VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
gijigadaasin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
ginibigin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
gipagaagamisin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
gizhibaa-gondaawijiwan VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
gizhiiwebaasin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
gizhiiyaanakwaasin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
gondaawijiwan VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
gwaashkwaashkwesin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
gwayakomon VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
gwekaasin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
inaabiigijiwan VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
inaasigamaasin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
ingodwaachinoon:ingodwaachin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
inwewebiisaan VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
ishkwaa-aabita-biboon VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
ishpaasin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
ishpisin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
izhiwebaasin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
jekisin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
maajiigin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
maazhigin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
madweskwadin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
magwegisin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
mamiskosin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
mashkawaakwakamigadin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
mayagaagamin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
megwekamigisin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
mikwamiiwaagamin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
minwaabiigisin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
mishiiwaatigoonsiwan VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
mitigowan VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
mookijiwan VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
naanaanikizigwa'an VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
nagaajiwan VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
naweyaakosin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
nibaadwewesin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
niibin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
niiskisin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
niminaawesin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
ningozigwaa'an VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
nishwaachinoon:nishwaachin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
nookisin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
ojaanimaa'an VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
okwaakwisinoon:okwaakwisin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
ondaaban VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
onjisin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
oshkigin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
waagaasin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
waaseyaaban VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
wadikwaniwan VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
washkisin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
webaasin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
wiinisin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
zaagaakwisin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
zaagiigisin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
zaasaagijijiwan VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
zasaagisin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
zhaangachinoon:zhaangachin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
zhengamin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
zhiibisin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
zhingadesin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
ziigijiwan VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
zoongadin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
